New York, session 2025-2026, A5135.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 421 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. provide all child protective services employees with supportive 4 mental health services and resources including but not limited to eye 5 movement desensitization and reprocessing (EMDR), vicarious and second- 6 ary trauma treatment and other forms of therapy, counseling, and infor- 7 mation as needed to support the health and wellbeing of such employees. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01095-01-5